Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.001

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Department" means department of agriculture;

(2) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association, corporation, or organized group of persons whether or not incorporated.

[ 1995 c 374 s 61.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.